src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverbs
!  ----------
!! Adverbs in the Sahaptin Tenino language describe the entities nouns refer to.

LEXICON Adverbs

anchʼa+Adv:ánchʼa # "many/" ;
chauwiyat+Adv:chauwíyat # "almost/" ;
chikuuk+Adv:chikuuk # "today/" ;
mƚ+Adv:mƚ # "how many/" ;
mƚnam+Adv:mƚnam # "how/" ;
palalai+Adv:palalái # "more/" ;
tƚʼina+Adv:tƚʼina # "??" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
